src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM !!= @CODE@ Loanwords, same as ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM  and  DEMONSTRANTIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM. For NO and SE adjectives ending on -ell, eksperimentell, ideell, parallell. The short form is nom parallælla, attr, parallella The long form: paralellalasj, attr parallellalasj. Different lexicon for these -ell adjectives because of err/orth tags. OBS, "individuell", is assimilated "indivijdalasj", and goes to lexicon  METÅVDÅLASJ.

+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: ELLA_LASJ_INFL_CMP ;

LEXICON ELLA_LASJ_INFL_CMP !!= @CODE@ 

  +Use/NotDNorm+Err/Der:ellal MEKÁNALASJ_CMP_INFL ; !No possible "ideellalasj" derivation since "ideælla" isn't a noun.
                       :ælºl  ÁLLA-ÆLLA           ;

              +Err/Orth:álal  MEKÁNALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
              +Err/Orth:alal  MEKÁNALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
              +Err/Orth:áll   ÁLLA-ÆLLA           ;
              +Err/Orth:elºl  ÁLLA-ÆLLA           ;
              +Err/Orth:ell   ÁLLA-ÆLLA           ;



LEXICON ÁLLA-ÆLLA !!= @CODE@
                   :a%>Q1  ATTR_PrsPrc         ; ! No vuohta derivation in this lexicon
                   :a%>    N-EVENSTRONGSTEMadj ;
                   :a%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj   ; ! cg in nominal paradigm
                   :a%>Q1    BU/MUS                  ;
                   :a%>    MUORRACmp           ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:a%>Q1t K-CONS             ; !
  
LEXICON MEKÁNALASJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Same as  METÅVDÅLASJ only without vuohta. 

                        :asj%>      ATTR_PrsPrc       ; ! No vuohta derivation in this lexicon
                 +Sg+Nom:asj%>      K-CONS            ;
                 +Sg+Ill:attja%>j   K-CONS            ;
        +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:adtja%>j   K-CONS            ;
                    +Ess:attja%>n   K-CONS            ;
           +Err/Orth+Ess:adtja%>n   K-CONS            ;
                        :attja%>    N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ; 
                        :%>         ABBO/AMOS         ;
      +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:attja%>t   K-CONS            ;
              +Cmp/SgNom:asj%>      R                 ;
              +Cmp/SgGen:lattja%>   R                 ;
              +Cmp/PlGen:lattja%>j  R                 ;
      
        +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:attja%>s%> PxCi              ; !
        +Err/Orth+Sg+Nom:attja%>    PxV               ; !
        +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:adtja%>s%> PxCi              ; !
        +Err/Orth+Sg+Nom:adtja%>    PxV               ; !  



! LEXICON DEMONSTRATIJVALASJ !!= @CODE@ Lexicon DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ now gives both demonstratijvva and demonstratijvalasj
! +OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: DEMONSTRATIJVALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
! 							
! LEXICON DEMONSTRATIJVALASJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@  Look like derived loan adjectives. However, they are not derived. Rather, these are "long" forms of short adjektives as those in DEMONSTRATIJVA and thus not true derivations. Same NO words as i DEMONSTRATIJVA, only another way of making the fit into sami, guess it's because of the odd predicative.  Odd-syllable comparison. Sg Acc: destruktijvalattjav, Attr: destruktijvalasj. (The -lasj is unpopular.)
! ! :asj VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
!                  +Sg+Nom:lasj%>      K-CONS            ;
!                         :lasj%>      ATTR              ;
!         +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:ladtja%>j   K-CONS            ;
!            +Err/Orth+Ess:ladtja%>n   K-CONS            ;
!                  +Sg+Ill:lattja%>j   K-CONS            ;
!                     +Ess:lattja%>n   K-CONS            ;
!                         :lattja%>    N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
!                         :l%>         ABBO/AMOS         ;
!         +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:lattja%>t   K-CONS            ;
!                +Cmp/SgNom:lasj%>      R                 ;
!                +Cmp/SgGen:lattja%>    R                 ;
!                +Cmp/PlGen:lattja%>j   R                 ;
!          +Err/Orth+Sg+Nom:ladtja%>    PxV               ; !
!          +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:ladtja%>s%> PxCi              ; !
!                   +Sg+Nom:lattja%>    PxV               ; !
!                   +Sg+Ill:lattja%>s%> PxCi              ; !
! 							
! 							


!LEXICON A_ADJEKTIV ! now in DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ
!+OLang/NOB: ADJEKTIJVVA_CMP_INFL ;
!
!LEXICON A_TABLETT ! now in DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ
!+OLang/NOB: TABLÆHTTA_CMP_INFL ;
!
!
! LEXICON AALASJ
!           +OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:åladtj  METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;
!  +Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:aladtj  METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;
!                     +CmpNP/Last:åladtj ASIDASJ_CMP_INFL      ;
!                     +CmpNP/Last:åladtj DÁRBULASJ_CMP_INFL    ;
!                     +CmpNP/Last:åladtj ÅLLAGSJ_CMP_INFL      ;
! 
! LEXICON ULASJ_DÁRBULASJ
! +CmpNP/Last:uladtj DÁRBULASJ_CMP_INFL ;
! +CmpNP/Last:uladtj ÅLLAGSJ_CMP_INFL ;
! +CmpNP/Last:uladtj ASIDASJ_CMP_INFL  ;
! +Err/Orth+CmpNP/Last:oladtj DÁRBULASJ_CMP_INFL ;
 
!   DÁRBULASJ ; !Err/Orth
!   DÁRBULASJ ;
! +CmpNP/Last: DÁRBULASJ_CMP_INFL ;
! 
!   
!
!
! LEXICON ALASJ
!   +Area/NO+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:aladtj
!   +Area/SE+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:aladtj
!
!   DEMONSTRATIJVALASJ ; ! LOAN
! +OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: DEMONSTRATIJVALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
!   ARKTALASJ ;
! +OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: ARKTALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
!   ÅLLAGASJ ;
! +CmpNP/Last: ÅLLAGSJ_CMP_INFL ;
!   
!
!
! LEXICON ELASJ
!   +Area/NO+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:eladtj
!   +Area/SE+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:eladtj
!
!   ÅLLAGASJ ; 
! +CmpNP/Last: ÅLLAGSJ_CMP_INFL ;
!   ASIDASJ ; !
! +CmpNP/Last: ASIDASJ_CMP_INFL  ;
!   DÁRBULASJ ;
! +CmpNP/Last: DÁRBULASJ_CMP_INFL ;
!   
!
!
! LEXICON ÁLASJ
!   +Area/NO+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:áladtj
!   +Area/SE+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:áladtj
!
!   ÅLLAGASJ ; !
! +CmpNP/Last: ÅLLAGSJ_CMP_INFL ;
!   DÁRBULASJ ;
! +CmpNP/Last: DÁRBULASJ_CMP_INFL ;
!   
!
!
! LEXICON OLASJ - eksisterer ikke slike ord?! 
!  +Area/NO+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:oladtj
!  +Area/SE+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last:oladtj
!  Funnet to ord, men to ulike lexicon.
! girkkolasj+Sem/Dummytag:girkkoladtj ÅLLAGASJ ;
! oavdolasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:oavdol DÁRBULASJ ; !


!!
!! Inherent comparatives and superlatives lexica
!!

LEXICON OANEP  !!= @CODE@ Inherent comparatives, gives comp and superl.  Adjectives that are lexicalized in their comparative (and superlative) forms, like sisŋep, bárep.  Some entries are likely incorrect compared forms of other adjectives, like ådåp and ruvvap (more research needed).


                                    +Gram/Comp:           BUStem       ;
                            +Der1+Der/Superl+A:muss       BUOREMUS     ;
                  +Gram/Comp+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:but        K-CONS       ;
          +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:musá%>t    K-CONS       ;
            +Gram/Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:bu»sj%>    K-CONS       ;
                   +Gram/Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:bu»sj%>    ATTR         ;
                   +Gram/Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:bu»ttja%>  CompSup-EVEN ;
+Err/Lex+Use/-Spell+Gram/Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:bu»dtja%>  CompSup-EVEN ;
 +Gram/Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:bu»ttja%>t K-CONS       ;


! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: lagáp # Even-syllable test
!!€ lagáp:             lagáp+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ lagámus:           lagáp+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom


LEXICON TJAVGGÁMUS   !!= @CODE@ Inherent superlatives, only gives superl. Some words are lexicalized in their superlative forms, like dájvvámus. Some are likely incorrect superlative forms, like tjábbámus (more research is needed)
                           
                    +Gram/Superl+Attr:muss%>  K-CONS            ;
                  +Gram/Superl+Sg+Nom:muss%>  K-CONS            ; ! the short form, twol shortens ss#
+Gram/Superl+Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:mussa%> PxV               ; ! ! ! separate nom bec of the short form
                         +Gram/Superl:mussa%> BUOREMUS-OBL      ; ! Add -a, directly to the obliques
       +Gram/Superl+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:musá%>t K-CONS            ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: dájvvámus # Even-syllable test
!!€ dájvvámus:           dájvvámus+A+Sg+Nom

!!
!! 4-syllable miscellanious stems
!!
